Missouri, session 2026, HB2.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri, for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, fund transfer, and program described herein for the item or items
stated, and for no other purpose whatsoever, chargeable to the fund designated for the period
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, as follows:
PART 1
Section 2.000. Each appropriation in this act shall consist of the item or
items in each section of Part 1 of this act, for the amount and
purpose and from the fund designated in each section of Part 1,
as well as all additional clarifications of purpose in Part 2 of this
act that make reference by section to said item or items in Part 1.
Any clarification of purpose in Part 2 shall state the section or
sections in Part 1 to which it attaches and shall, together with the

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 2
language of said section(s) in Part 1, form the complete statement
of purpose of the appropriation. As such, the provisions of Part
2 of this act shall not be severed from Part 1, and if any
clarification of purpose in Part 2 is for any reason held to be
invalid, such decision shall invalidate all of the appropriations in
this act of which said clarification of purpose is a part. Part 3 of
this act shall consist of guidance to the Department of Elementary
and Secondary Education in implementing the appropriations
found in Part 1 and Part 2 of this act. An appropriation may be
comprised in whole or in part of a one-time amount, and such
one-time amount shall be construed to be a component part of,
and not in addition to, the stated appropriation amount. Any
amount of an appropriation identified as “one-time” in this act
shall not be considered an addition to any ongoing core
appropriation(s) in future fiscal periods beyond June 30, 2026.
Any amount identified as one-time may, however, be requested
in any future fiscal period as a new decision item.
Section 2.005. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Division of Financial and Administrative Services, provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 2.505
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,860,797
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 187,418
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,048,215
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,576,451
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 709,957
From Elementary and Secondary Education – Federal Fund (1105) ...........................3,286,408
For the Division of Financial and Administrative Services
For the Summer Electronic Benefit Transfer (EBT) program
For administrative expenses
Personal Service ....................................................................................................61,186
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 142,695
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................203,881
Personal Service ....................................................................................................61,186

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 3
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 142,695
From Elementary and Secondary Education – Federal Fund (1105) ................... 203,881
Total (Not to exceed 81.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$6,742,385
Section 2.010. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For refunds
From Federal Funds (Various) ...................................................................................$2,510,000
Section 2.015. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For distributions to the free public schools of $4,689,311,449 under the
School Foundation Program as provided in Chapter 163, RSMo,
provided that no funds are used to support the distribution or
sharing of any individually identifiable student data for non-
educational purposes, marketing or advertising, as follows:
For the Foundation Formula, provided that the State Adequacy Target
pursuant to Section 163.011, RSMo, shall not exceed $7,145
Program Distribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..................................................................$2,590,867,114
From Outstanding Schools Trust Fund (1287) ........................................................836,989,361
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) ........................................................................139,072,360
From State School Moneys Fund (1616) .................................................................272,959,329
From Classroom Trust Fund (1784) ........................................................................441,763,770
From Sports Wagering for Education Fund (1244) ............................................. 1,084,066
Total Foundation Formula ....................................................................................4,282,736,000
For Transportation
Program Distribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $15,208,835 one-time) ................302,702,347
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) .................................................................... 73,873,102
Total Transportation .................................................................................................376,575,449
For the Small Schools Program
Program Distribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 30,000,000
Total ....................................................................................................................$4,689,311,449

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 4
Section 2.020. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For State Board of Education operated school programs, provided
twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed between
personal service and expense and equipment, and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 2.505
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$37,440,655
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 19,401,945
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................56,842,600
Personal Service ..................................................................................................957,447
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 10,014,091
From Elementary and Secondary Education – Federal Fund (1105) .........................10,971,538
Expense and Equipment
From Bingo Proceeds for Education Fund (1289) ............................................... 1,876,355
Total (Not to exceed 632.27 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$69,690,493
Section 2.025. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood
For pre-kindergarten education program grants to child care facilities as
defined in Section 210.201, RSMo, that are licensed under
Section 210.221, RSMo, or that are unlicensed and registered
with the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education to
serve students in the year prior to kindergarten eligibility in a
program consistent with Section 161.213, RSMo, with
reimbursements not to exceed $7,145 per individual child
receiving a minimum of 1,044 hours of instruction, with priority
given to students at or below 185% of the federal poverty level
not already receiving a full child care subsidy for the same
instructional services
Program Distribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$16,234,588
Section 2.030. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 5
For pre-kindergarten education program grants to local education
agencies to serve students, or contract to serve students, in the
year prior to kindergarten eligibility in a program consistent with
Section 161.213, RSMo, with reimbursements not to exceed the
product of the state adequacy target of $7,145, and the dollar
value modifier per each average daily attendance as defined in
Section 163.011, RSMo, with priority given to students at or
below 185% of the federal poverty level
Program Distribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$55,830,843
Section 2.035. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Educator Quality
For Career Ladder, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between this section and Section 2.040
Program Distribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$31,058,050
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) .................................................................... 37,467,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$68,525,050
Section 2.040. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Educator Quality
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Teacher Baseline Salary Grant Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$33,421,374
For a grant program to provide a baseline educator salary of $40,000,
provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between this
section and Section 2.035
Program Distribution
From Teacher Baseline Salary Grant Fund (1306) .............................................. 33,421,374
Total .........................................................................................................................$66,842,748
Section 2.045. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For distributions to the free public schools under the American Rescue
Plan Act

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 6
Program Distribution
From Department of Elementary and Secondary Education Federal
Emergency Relief 2021 Fund (2434) .............................................................$2,922,778
For distributions to the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education under the American Rescue Plan Act
Personal Service ..................................................................................................283,821
Expense and Equipment, provided one hundred percent (100%)
flexibility is allowed between programs in this subsection
For teacher and leader training .......................................................................................996,350
For a teacher recruitment and retention grant program .............................................16,259,643
For the Missouri Read, Lead, Exceed Program .........................................................13,338,428
For the Missouri Mathematics Mastery Program ........................................................8,610,218
For mental health support initiatives ............................................................................2,611,255
For an assessment system redesign ..............................................................................5,606,037
For a summer learning program, including summer enrichment
programs provided by community-based organizations ..................................2,190,540
For after school programs ............................................................................................4,463,990
For data system upgrades ................................................................................................594,457
For administration ................................................................................................ 5,655,347
From Department of Elementary and Secondary Education Federal
Emergency Relief 2021 Fund (2434) .............................................................60,610,086
For the procurement of a chemistry and physical science online learning
platform for middle school and high school students, provided the
platform aligns to Missouri science standards and highlights
science, technology, engineering, and mathematics and career
and technical education pathways in Missouri to increase
students’ interest in pursuing a chemistry-related career
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ................................................. 2,000,000
Total (Not to exceed 3.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$65,532,864
Section 2.050. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For a summer enrichment program grant to a not-for-profit organization
that inspires a brighter future for students most in need by
providing opportunities to experience high-quality academics,
engaging enrichment activities, and health life skills, provided
that the organization has a primary office location in a city with

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 7
more than twenty-seven thousand but fewer than thirty thousand
inhabitants and located in a county with more than one million
inhabitants, further provided that such funds be awarded through
a competitive grant process
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$50,000
Section 2.053. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For grants to public schools to acquire new or replace buses with new
buses that meet low NOx emissions standards of .02 g/bhp-hr and
operate using on-board propulsion systems (all fuels) energy
rated to deliver at least 250 miles per duty cycle; and further
provided preference is given to buses using U.S. sourced parts,
assembly and fuel
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$3,000,000
Section 2.055. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For a patriotic and civics training program to prepare teachers to teach
the principles of American civics and patriotism, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
2.505
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$500,000
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For a not-for-profit organization that focuses on health, hunger, and
hygiene, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 2.505
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,500,000
For distributions of the Governor’s Emergency Education Relief Funds
for Emergency Assistance to Non-Public schools under the
American Rescue Plan Act, provided that no funds may be used
for distributions under Section 312(d) of the Coronavirus
Response and Relief Supplemental Appropriations Act
From Department of Elementary and Secondary Education Federal
Emergency Relief 2021 Fund (2434) ....................................................... 23,379,743
Total .........................................................................................................................$26,379,743

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 8
Section 2.060. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the School Nutrition Services Program to reimburse schools for
school food programs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,412,151
From Elementary and Secondary Education – Federal Fund (1105) ................... 327,908,012
Total .......................................................................................................................$331,320,163
Section 2.065. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Educator Quality
For a program to recruit, train, and/or develop teachers to teach in
academically struggling school districts
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $300,000 one-time) .......................$2,000,000
Section 2.067. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For a non-profit organization located in any city with more than four
hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county that is committed to sustaining and retaining black male
educators by fostering engagement beyond the classroom; this
program emphasises mentorship, tutoring, and community
leadership as essential tools to strengthen identity, build trust, and
cultivate meaningful connections within school communities,
ultimately supporting the success and longevity of black male
educators in the education system
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$100,000
Section 2.068. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For a non-profit organization located in any city with more than one
hundred twenty-five thousand but fewer than one hundred sixty
thousand inhabitants, which advance student success by
transforming the educator at any level through professional
development that is focused on authentic learning, building
community, and using high-quality lesson design, and powered
by innovative technology, for statewide prosocial education
training initiatives for school districts and charter schools
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$500,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 9
Section 2.070. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For planning, design, procurement, and implementation of a K-3 reading
assessment system for preliminary identification of students at
risk for dyslexia and related disorders including analysis of
phonological and phonemic awareness, rapid automatic naming,
alphabetic principle, phonics, reading fluency, spelling, reading
accuracy, vocabulary, and reading comprehension
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$400,000
Section 2.072. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Elementary Literacy Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,000,000
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For the Home Reading program pursuant to Section 161.239, RSMo
Program Distribution
From Elementary Literacy Fund (1314) .............................................................. 5,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$10,000,000
Section 2.073. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For lead and asbestos abatement at a museum experience, located in any
city with more than four thousand four hundred but fewer than
four thousand nine hundred inhabitants and located in a county
with more than two hundred thirty thousand but fewer than two
hundred sixty thousand inhabitants, which creates a living culture
around literature, accessible to all, that will nourish, empower,
and inspire the reading lives of children and adults
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$400,000
Section 2.074. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For distribution to a non-profit organization in a county with more than
one million inhabitants, for the renovation and improvements of
an educational supply store that is used as the operational hub for

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 10
supply chain activities related to the weekly distribution of
schools supplies and educational resources, provided that local
matching funds must be provided on a 50/50 state/local basis
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$1,000,000
Section 2.075. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
To reimburse school districts and charters for costs associated
with reading assessments, designated reading programs, supplies,
and other reading materials
From Evidence-based Reading Instruction Program Fund (1214) ..........................$14,000,000
Section 2.076. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For the instruction of teachers and administrators in an evidence-based
literacy program as provided in subsection 161.241.5, RSMo
From Evidence-based Reading Instruction Program Fund (1214) ............................$3,000,000
Section 2.078. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For a program dedicated to educational enrichment, tutoring, and support
in the areas of science, technology, engineering, and math serving
underserved and low-income students in a city with more than
four hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$250,000
Section 2.080. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the STEM
Career Awareness Program Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$370,000
Section 2.085. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 11
For the STEM Career Awareness Program
From STEM Career Awareness Program Fund (1997) ................................................$370,000
Section 2.086. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For a not-for-profit organization for the design, supplies, machines,
furniture, training, and curriculum for a turn-key program
focused on STEM with a three-pronged approach with schools,
business, and state buy-in, provided that up to a total of ten (10)
grants are awarded and further provided that local matching funds
must be provided on a 50/50 state/local basis
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$500,000
Section 2.090. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Computer Science Education Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$450,000
Section 2.095. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For Computer Science Education
Personal Service ..................................................................................................$54,507
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 12,509
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................67,016
For Computer Science Education
From Computer Science Education Fund (1423) ................................................ 450,000
Total (Not to exceed 1.00 F.T.E.) .................................................................................$517,016
Section 2.096. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For a non-profit organization, located in any city with more than four
hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county, which provides computer training technology certificates
and robotics for ages seven through seventeen

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 12
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$250,000
Section 2.097. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For a vendor contract with a company or with companies to deliver live
video-based high-dosage tutoring to elementary school students
enrolled in Missouri public school, provided that DESE will
select the local education agencies (LEAs) that will participate;
students whose reading assessments indicate that they are not
reading on grade level will be eligible to participate; any
company with which DESE contracts for this program shall be a
company based in the United States that has been in operation for
at least 10 years; that has experience delivering high-dosage
tutoring to students across the United States, including in
Missouri; and has the capacity to deliver high-dosage tutoring at
scale
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$2,500,000
Section 2.098. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For a nonprofit organization that engages solely men and fathers that
operates a tutoring (reading) literacy program focused on
underserved youth in a city not within a county
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$400,000
Section 2.099. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For a non-profit organization, which aims to be a light and true conduit
of change for all people in the communities they serve through
signature programming and grant making, to provide funding for
school improvements
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$400,000
Section 2.100. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For distributions to the public elementary and secondary schools in this
state, pursuant to Chapters 144, 163, and 164, RSMo, pertaining
to the School District Trust Fund
From School District Trust Fund (1688) ............................................................$1,306,961,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 13
Section 2.105. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Quality Schools
For the Missouri Scholars and Fine Arts Academies
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,100,000
Section 2.107. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For youth arts program expansion for a non-profit organization, located
in any city with more than four hundred thousand inhabitants and
located in more than one county, which stewards a
comprehensive ecosystem that develops young artists personally
and professionally through mentorship, mental health support,
creative workforce pipelines, and community care
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$198,000
Section 2.110. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For a school-based mental health coordinator
Personal Service ..................................................................................................$91,361
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 20,024
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 1.00 F.T.E.) ...............................$111,385
Section 2.113. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the purpose of supporting safe schools programs, including the
development, review, and practice of Emergency Operations
Plans utilizing an all-hazards approach, with consideration for the
needs of students with disabilities; for utilization of an online
customizable Emergency Operations Plans tool; for providing
incident command system and structure training; for cyber and
artificial intelligence (AI) threat management; and for resources
and training related to physical site assessments; funds shall be
distributed to a statewide education organization whose
governing board consists entirely of public school board
members; the organization shall have a flexibility allowance of
up to three percent of the total appropriation for administrative

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 14
and operational purposes related to the implementation of this
section
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,000,000
Section 2.115. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Quality Schools
For grants to establish safe schools programs addressing active shooter
response training and school safety measures, including the
hiring of school counselors to provide students with mental health
services pertaining to suicide and other behavioral health needs,
provided that grants are to be distributed by a statewide education
organization whose directors consist entirely of public school
board members, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 2.505
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,000,000
Section 2.117. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For a non-profit organization whose mission is to assist youth with
substance use disorder services for the establishment of a
recovery high school pursuant to Section 167.850, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$500,000
Section 2.120. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Quality Schools
For the Virtual Schools Program
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$200,000
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) .................................................................... 389,778
Total ..............................................................................................................................$589,778
Section 2.125. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For costs associated with school district bonds
From School District Bond Fund (1248) ......................................................................$492,000
Section 2.130. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 15
For receiving and expending grants, donations, contracts, and payments
from private, federal, and other governmental agencies which
may become available between sessions of the General Assembly
provided that the General Assembly shall be notified of the
source of any new funds and the purpose for which they shall be
expended, in writing, prior to the use of said funds
Personal Service ....................................................................................................$4,183
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 46,500
From Vocational Rehabilitation Fund (1104) ...................................................................50,683
Expense and Equipment
From Elementary and Secondary Education – Federal Fund (1105) ................... 6,000,303
Total ...........................................................................................................................$6,050,986
Section 2.135. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Division of Learning Services, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 2.505, and
further provided that no funds are used to support the collection,
distribution, or sharing of any individually identifiable student
data with the federal government; with the exception of the
reporting requirements of the Migrant Education Program funds
in Section 2.205, the Vocational Rehabilitation funds in Section
2.265, and the Disability Determination funds in Section 2.270
Personal Service .............................................................................................$5,064,268
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 395,748
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................5,460,016
Personal Service ...............................................................................................7,557,169
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,473,191
From Elementary and Secondary Education – Federal Fund (1105) .........................10,030,360
Personal Service ..................................................................................................965,896
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,319,987
From Excellence in Education Fund (1651) ................................................................3,285,883
For the Office of Adult Learning and Rehabilitative Services
Personal Service .............................................................................................41,129,076
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,700,549
From Vocational Rehabilitation Fund (1104) ...................................................... 44,829,625

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 16
Total (Not to exceed 862.51 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$63,605,884
Section 2.140. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For a statewide longitudinal data system
From Elementary and Secondary Education – Federal Fund (1105) .........................$1,849,907
Section 2.145. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For funding an early literacy program targeting third grade reading
success in academically struggling school districts which
provides a full continuum of school-based, early literacy
intervention services, for all grades Pre-K through third grade,
consisting of developmentally appropriate components for each
grade delivered each day school is in session by professionally
coached, full-time interventionists who collect data regularly and
use an intervention model that is comprehensive, has been proven
to be effective in one or more empirical studies, and is provided
by a not-for-profit organization to a local education agency or
community-based early childhood center
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$455,000
Section 2.147. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For a non-profit organization, located in any city with more than four
hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county, to provide a summer literacy enrichment program with
goals to get children to their reading level and provide leadership
development programs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$100,000
Section 2.150. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Quality Schools
For the Performance Based Assessment Program, provided that no funds
are used to support the collection, distribution, or sharing of any
individually identifiable student data with the federal
government; with the exception of the reporting requirements of

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 17
the Migrant Education Program funds in Section 2.205, the
Vocational Rehabilitation funds in Section 2.265, and the
Disability Determination funds in Section 2.270, and further
provided that no funds from this section shall be used for license
fees or membership dues for the Smarter Balanced Assessment
Consortium
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$8,972,212
From Elementary and Secondary Education – Federal Fund (1105) ...........................8,567,628
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) .................................................................... 4,311,255
Total .........................................................................................................................$21,851,095
Section 2.155. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Quality Schools
For innovative assessments to better measure academic achievement
From Elementary and Secondary Education – Federal Fund (1105) ............................$500,000
Section 2.157. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the planning, design, maintenance, construction or repair of an
outdoor track at a school district located in a city with more than
one thousand nine hundred but fewer than two thousand one
hundred fifty inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county
with more than twenty-two thousand but fewer than twenty-five
thousand inhabitants, provided that local matching funds must be
provided on a 50/50 state/local basis
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$1,500,000
Section 2.160. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For the design, renovation, construction, and improvements of career and
technical schools, provided that local matching funds must be
provided on a 50/50 state/local basis
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,500,000
Section 2.161. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 18
For an organization, located in a city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county, that
empowers communities through social entrepreneurship, health,
and civic engagement initiatives through community
programming
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................$50,000
Section 2.162. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For a non-profit organization, located in any city with more than one
hundred sixty thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand
inhabitants, with wrap-a-round support services available
through multiple outreach programs that meet community needs
affecting infant to elder, for a K-12 math program
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$300,000
Section 2.163. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For nationally recognized career readiness assessments to be made
available for all eleventh or twelfth grade students that measure
foundational career readiness skills, including applied
mathematics, workplace documents, and graphic literacy and
lead to a nationally recognized work-readiness credential that is
used by site selectors to rank states for site selection and
economic development
From Sports Wagering for Education Fund (1244) (one-time) .................................$1,200,000
Section 2.164. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For a not-for-profit organization located in a city with more than four
hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county for K-12 career literacy resources for students to expand
pathways to economic growth and opportunity
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................$90,000
Section 2.165. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 19
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For the Vocational-Technical Education Enhancement Grant award
program, provided that local match be provided in order to be
eligible for state funds
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .....................................................$10,000,000
For career center operations
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 1,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$11,000,000
Section 2.168. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For a collaborative initiative that connects the Missouri public school
community for research and development of innovation zone
districts, competency-based education, and establishing a waiver
from the federal government for statewide testing
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,000,000
Section 2.170. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For Career and Technical Education, provided that no funds are used for
advertising
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$52,071,607
For distributions to providers of career and technical education programs
From Elementary and Secondary Education – Federal Fund (1105) ................... 30,701,460
Total .........................................................................................................................$82,773,067
Section 2.172. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For a school district located in any city with more than sixteen thousand
but fewer than eighteen thousand inhabitants and partially located
in a county with more than thirty-five thousand but fewer than
forty thousand inhabitants for equipment, design, renovation,
construction, improvements, and program expansions of a career
and technical school, that host nine regional high schools, located
in any city with more than sixteen thousand but fewer than
eighteen thousand inhabitants and partially located in a county

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 20
with more than thirty-five thousand but fewer than forty thousand
inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$1,000,000
Section 2.175. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For supporting and expanding Registered Youth Apprenticeship
programs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$611,000
Section 2.180. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For the Missouri Career Advising Initiative
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,500,000
Section 2.185. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For dyslexia programs, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 2.505
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...................................................................................$107
From Evidence-based Reading Instruction Program Fund (1214) ...................... 600,000
Total ..............................................................................................................................$600,107
Section 2.190. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For the Missouri Healthy Schools, Successful Students Program
From Elementary and Secondary Education – Federal Fund (1105) ............................$449,126
Section 2.195. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For the Missouri Project AWARE program to address the mental health
needs of youth
From Elementary and Secondary Education – Federal Fund (1105) .........................$1,706,948

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 21
Section 2.200. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For the Comprehensive Literacy Development Program
Expense and Equipment ....................................................................................$813,735
Program Distribution ............................................................................... 10,185,429
From Elementary and Secondary Education – Federal Fund (1105) .......................$10,999,164
Section 2.203. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For a public school district located within a city not within a county, a
district-wide innovative “Literacy Course” reading tiered
systematic intervention program using reading teachers and
academic instructional coaches who will model literacy lessons
for classroom teachers and provide support for individual
students with reading deficiencies, and determine reading tiers
and track student progress; provided that each student has an
Individualized Reading Plan to monitor their progress over time
as they enter each grade
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,500,000
Section 2.205. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Quality Schools
For improving the academic achievement of the disadvantaged programs
operated by local education agencies under Title I of the
Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 as amended by
the Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015, provided twenty-five
percent (25%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
2.350
From Elementary and Secondary Education – Federal Fund (1105) .....................$247,840,470
Section 2.210. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Quality Schools
For facilitating the identification, enrollment, attendance, and success in
school of homeless children and youths under Title IX, Part A of
the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 as
amended by the Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 22
From Elementary and Secondary Education – Federal Fund (1105) .........................$1,400,000
For facilitating the identification, enrollment, attendance, and success in
school of homeless children and youths as authorized by the
American Rescue Plan Act
From Department of Elementary and Secondary Education Federal
Emergency Relief 2021 Fund (2434) ....................................................... 2,265,253
Total ...........................................................................................................................$3,665,253
Section 2.215. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Quality Schools
For programs for the gifted from interest earnings accruing in the
Stephen Morgan Ferman Memorial for Education of the Gifted
From State School Moneys Fund (1616) ..........................................................................$9,027
Section 2.220. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Quality Schools
For the Supporting Effective Instruction Grants Program pursuant to
Title II of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965
as amended by the Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015
From Elementary and Secondary Education – Federal Fund (1105) .......................$35,001,143
Section 2.225. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Quality Schools
For the Rural Education Initiative grants pursuant to Title V, Part B of
the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 as
amended by the Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015
From Elementary and Secondary Education – Federal Fund (1105) .........................$3,225,567
Section 2.230. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Quality Schools
For language acquisition pursuant to Title III of the Elementary and
Secondary Education Act of 1965 as amended by the Every
Student Succeeds Act of 2015
Program Distribution

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 23
From Elementary and Secondary Education – Federal Fund (1105) .........................$4,891,794
Section 2.232. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For character education initiatives
Program Distribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$525,000
Section 2.235. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Quality Schools
For Student Support and Enrichment grants pursuant to Title IV, Part A
of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 as
amended by the Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015
From Elementary and Secondary Education – Federal Fund (1105) .......................$24,840,365
Section 2.240. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Quality Schools
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the School
Turnaround Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$885,000
Section 2.245. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Quality Schools
For the School Turnaround Program
Program Distribution
From School Turnaround Fund (1439) .........................................................................$975,000
Section 2.250. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Educator Quality
For the Teacher of the Year Program
From Elementary and Secondary Education – Federal Fund (1105) ..............................$40,000
Section 2.255. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Educator Quality

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 24
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Teacher Recruitment and Retention State Scholarship Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,600,000
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) ...............................................................................800,000
For the Teacher Recruitment and Retention State Scholarship Program
Program Distribution
From Teacher Recruitment and Retention State Scholarship Fund (1221) ......... 2,400,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$4,800,000
Section 2.256. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Educator Quality
For Grow Your Own grants, provided funds shall be distributed based
upon a competitive process, subject to the following allocations:
For community colleges, provided a total of five (5) grants are awarded
in the amount of $45,000 each
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$225,000
For educator preparation programs, provided a total of fifteen (15) grants
are awarded in the amount of $45,000 each
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................675,000
For local education agencies (LEAs), provided a total of one hundred
twenty five (125) grants are awarded in the amount of $12,800
each, for the purposes of: 1) $6,000 awarded for student
organizations and administrative costs within the LEA; 2) $6,800
awarded as scholarships for the recruitment and retention of a
student who has graduated from said LEA and is pursuing teacher
certification in a high need subject area
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 1,600,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$2,500,000
Section 2.260. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Educator Quality
For the Project Extended Impact program
From Elementary and Secondary Education – Federal Fund (1105) .........................$3,316,380

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 25
Section 2.261. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Educator Quality
For the Missouri Leadership Development System program
Program Distribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$600,000
From Excellence in Education Fund (1651) ........................................................ 600,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,200,000
Section 2.262. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Educator Quality
For the Missouri Teacher Development System program
Program Distribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,600,000
Section 2.265. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Adult Learning and Rehabilitation Services
For the Vocational Rehabilitation Program
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$15,841,442
From Vocational Rehabilitation Fund (1104) ............................................................51,877,223
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) ............................................................................1,400,000
For Payments by the Department of Mental Health
From Vocational Rehabilitation Fund (1104) ...................................................... 1,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$70,118,665
Section 2.270. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Adult Learning and Rehabilitation Services
For the Disability Determination Program
From Vocational Rehabilitation Fund (1104) ..........................................................$20,175,837
Section 2.275. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Adult Learning and Rehabilitation Services
For Independent Living Centers, provided three percent (3%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 2.505
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,060,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 26
From Vocational Rehabilitation Fund (1104) ..............................................................2,675,306
From Independent Living Center Fund (1284) ...............................................................190,556
For an equal increase on a percentage basis for Independent Living
Centers that receive additional funding directly from the federal
government
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................160,555
For equalization of state funding to Independent Living Centers that do
not receive additional funding directly from the federal
government
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 1,739,446
Total ...........................................................................................................................$6,825,863
Section 2.280. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For distributions to educational institutions for the Adult Basic Education
Program, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 2.505
Expense and Equipment ......................................................................................$10,542
Program Distribution ............................................................................... 5,004,326
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................5,014,868
Expense and Equipment ......................................................................................$15,812
Program Distribution ............................................................................... 10,098,482
From Elementary and Secondary Education – Federal Fund (1105) ................... 10,114,294
Total .........................................................................................................................$15,129,162
Section 2.285. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For a workforce diploma program for adults without a high school
diploma as designated by the Department of Elementary and
Secondary Education
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $2,000,000 one-time) ....................$4,000,000
Section 2.286. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 27
For a classroom to a career project that provides students with
experiences related to future economic mobility and financial
freedom
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,000,000
Section 2.290. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Special Education
For the Special Education Program, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 2.310
From Elementary and Secondary Education – Federal Fund (1105) .....................$253,512,035
Section 2.295. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Special Education
For special education excess costs
Program Distribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$39,946,351
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) .................................................................... 19,590,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$59,536,351
Section 2.300. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood
Personal Service .............................................................................................$3,220,792
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 190,499
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,411,291
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,666,931
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 154,428
From Elementary and Secondary Education – Federal Fund (1105) ...........................1,821,359
Personal Service ...............................................................................................8,617,515
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,025,088
From Child Care and Development Block Grant Federal Fund (1168) ............... 10,642,603
Total (Not to exceed 216.50 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$15,875,253
Section 2.305. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 28
For the Early Childhood Special Education Program
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$199,660,990
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) ..........................................................................16,548,507
From Early Childhood Development, Education and Care Fund (1859) ............ 21,464,533
Total .......................................................................................................................$237,674,030
Section 2.310. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood
For the Special Education Program, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 2.290
From Elementary and Secondary Education – Federal Fund (1105) .......................$27,000,000
Section 2.315. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood
For Early Childhood Development, provided that the Department of
Elementary and Secondary Education shall coordinate the
delivery of Parent Education Services with the Home Visiting
Programs within the Office of Administration
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$23,418,975
From Early Childhood Development, Education and Care Fund (1859) ....................5,000,000
For reimbursements to school districts for Parent Education in
conjunction with the Early Childhood Education and Screening
Program, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 2.505
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................198,200
For Early Childhood Development in unaccredited or provisionally
accredited districts, provided that the Department of Elementary
and Secondary Education shall coordinate the delivery of Parent
Education Services with the Home Visiting Programs within the
Office of Administration
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 500,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$29,117,175
Section 2.325. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 29
For the Office of Childhood
For a book gifting program that mails free, high-quality books to children
from birth to age five
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$6,000,000
Section 2.326. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For repair or replacement of an elevator in a library located in any city
with more than one thousand three hundred but fewer than one
thousand five hundred inhabitants and that is the county seat of a
county with more than twenty-two thousand but fewer than
twenty-five thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$250,000
Section 2.327. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the revitalization of a public library located on the east side of any
city with more than four hundred thousand inhabitants and
located in more than one county that features a strong collection
of African American literature
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$1,000,000
Section 2.330. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood
For the early childhood comprehensive system
From Elementary and Secondary Education – Federal Fund (1105) ............................$894,878
Section 2.335. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood
For development of a voluntary early learning quality assurance report
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$119,713
For receiving and expending early childhood education grants
From Elementary and Secondary Education – Federal Fund (1105) .........................17,200,043
For Early Childhood Missouri Scholarships, provided no funds are used
for new scholarships
From Child Care and Development Block Grant Federal Fund (1168)

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 30
(one-time) ................................................................................................. 700,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$18,019,756
Section 2.340. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood
For the First Steps Program, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 2.505
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$63,844,655
From Elementary and Secondary Education – Federal Fund (1105) .........................12,311,843
From Part C Early Intervention System Fund (1788) .......................................... 11,500,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$87,656,498
Section 2.345. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood
For the Language Equality and Acquisition for Deaf Kids (LEAD-K) Act
pursuant to Section 161.396, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$452,731
Section 2.350. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood
For improving the academic achievement of the disadvantaged programs
operated by local education agencies under Title I of the
Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965, as amended
by the Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015, provided twenty-five
percent (25%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
2.205
From Elementary and Secondary Education – Federal Fund (1105) .......................$31,411,225
Section 2.355. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood
For the School Age Afterschool Program
From Elementary and Secondary Education – Federal Fund (1105) .......................$16,014,673
From Child Care and Development Block Grant Federal Fund (1168) .......................1,263,063

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 31
For before and after school programs, provided that such funds shall be
awarded through a competitive grant process
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................7,398,064
From Early Childhood Development, Education and Care Fund (1859) .......................295,399
For afterschool programs in urban areas with a focus on addressing the
needs of students in school districts affected by gun violence,
with a priority of serving high poverty students
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 350,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$25,321,199
Section 2.356. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood
For School Age After School Programs
For an afterschool network program that supports and advocates for
high-quality afterschool programs statewide in Missouri
From Elementary and Secondary Education – Federal Fund (1105) .........................$4,300,000
Section 2.360. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood
For Child Care Quality Initiatives, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 2.505
For the general administration of the quality initiatives programs,
including development and implementation of automated
systems to enhance time, attendance reporting, contract
compliance, payment accuracy, monitoring, referral services,
professional development, Early Head Start, parent education,
background screenings, and to support the Educare Program
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,757,353
From Child Care and Development Block Grant Federal Fund (1168) .....................37,342,504
For quality assurance rating
From Child Care and Development Block Grant Federal Fund (1168) ..........................500,000
For enhancing child care health and safety practices through provider
outreach
From Elementary and Secondary Education – Federal Fund (1105) ..............................259,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 32
From Child Care and Development Block Grant Federal Fund (1168) ..........................414,362
For activities to improve the quality of childcare, increase the availability
of early childhood development programs, before and after
school care, in-home services for families with newborn children,
and for general administration of the program
From Elementary and Secondary Education – Federal Fund (1105) ..............................462,565
For early childhood development, education, and care programs for low-
income families
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,500,000
For innovation grants
From Child Care and Development Block Grant Federal Fund (1168) ............... 10,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$55,235,784
Section 2.361. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood
For building renovations for a not-for-profit organization early childhood
center located in a county with more than forty thousand but
fewer than fifty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with
more than eighteen thousand but fewer than twenty-one thousand
inhabitants
From Child Care and Development Block Grant Federal Fund (1168)
(one-time) ......................................................................................................$4,000,000
Section 2.363. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood
For the implementation of a program to support child care providers
across the state of Missouri, with funding to support: recruitment
and licensing of new child care providers and workforce to
increase access to quality child care for families statewide;
business optimization, training, and sustainability support for
existing child care providers to enhance program quality and
operations; development of digital resources for providers,
including professional business websites with tools for
enrollment management, invoicing, expense reporting, and

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 33
parent communications; and provision of in-person community-
building events, personalized coaching, marketing assistance,
and enrollment in training programs designed to improve
business operations for child care providers
From Child Care and Development Block Grant Federal Fund (1168)
(one-time) .......................................................................................................$2,000,000
Section 2.365. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood
For Child Care Subsidy, provided twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 2.370 and three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 2.505
For child care subsidy payments for low-income families, provided that
the income thresholds for child care subsidies shall be a full
traditional subsidy benefit for individuals with an income which
is less than or equal to 150 percent of the federal poverty level; a
transitional benefit with a sliding scale fee for individuals with an
income which is less than or equal to 185 percent of the federal
poverty level but greater than 150 percent of the federal poverty
level; a transitional benefit with a sliding scale fee for individuals
with an income which is less than or equal to 215 percent of the
federal poverty level but greater than 185 percent of federal
poverty level
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$16,627,030
From Child Care and Development Block Grant Federal Fund (1168) ...................264,015,566
From Early Childhood Development, Education and Care Fund (1859) ....................5,387,924
Expense and Equipment
From Child Care and Development Block Grant Federal Fund (1168) ............... 1,616,328
Total .......................................................................................................................$287,646,848
Section 2.370. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood
For Child Care Subsidy, provided twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility
is allowed between this section and Section 2.365, and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 2.505

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 34
For child care subsidy payments for children under the care or custody
of the Department of Social Services Children's Division,
provided the subsidy paid to providers on behalf of children in
legal custody of the Children's Division shall be no less than the
market rate by region and provider-type, in accordance with the
latest market rate study performed by or for the office
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,836,137
From Child Care and Development Block Grant Federal Fund (1168)
(including $21,512,625 one-time) ..................................................................71,096,291
From Early Childhood Development, Education and Care Fund (1859) ............ 1,891,177
Total .........................................................................................................................$78,823,605
Section 2.372. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For a tri-share model based on income for the childcare of dependents of
first responders, located in any city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$3,000,000
Section 2.375. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Special Education
For payments to school districts for children in residential placements
through the Department of Mental Health or the Department of
Social Services pursuant to Section 167.126, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,692,315
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) ............................................................................4,750,000
For payments to school districts for children in residential placements
through the Department of Mental Health or the Department of
Social Services pursuant to Section 167.126, RSMo, provided
that said placements make up at least thirty percent (30%) of an
eligible district’s prior year average daily attendance
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) .................................................................... 250,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$7,692,315
Section 2.380. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
For funding of a school within a school to provide a turn-key intervention
program that educates at-risk middle school students to learn in

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 35
highly innovative, highly engaging, hands-on STEM-focused
curriculum, provided such program shall have documented
results of improving students up to two grade levels in one school
year as proven in other states, and further provided such
appropriation shall be distributed in $1,000,000 grant increments
to each school district which applies for the grant
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$1,000,000
Section 2.385. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For the purpose of providing tampons, sanitary napkins, and other related
products in the school nurse’s office, student health center, or
other area designated by the school administration for all middle
school, junior high, and high school buildings in which there are
students in grades six through twelve, at no charge to students
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$650,000
Section 2.387. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For a vendor contract that provides public schools asthma rescue
medication such as metered dose inhalers and albuterol, peak
flow meters, spacers, and other related equipment and training to
school health officials who treat children with asthma and
allergies in the school setting
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$1,295,000
Section 2.390. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Special Education
For the Sheltered Workshops Program, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 2.505
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$30,000,000
For competitive grants to sheltered workshops for the purpose of skills
training, infrastructure, and/or equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ................................................. 2,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$32,000,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 36
Section 2.391. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For a sheltered workshop located in any city with more than eleven
thousand but fewer than twelve thousand five hundred
inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county with more than
twenty-two thousand but fewer than twenty-five thousand
inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$2,000,000
Section 2.395. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Special Education
For payments to readers for blind or visually disabled students in
elementary and secondary schools, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 2.505
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$25,000
Section 2.400. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Special Education
For a task force on blind student academic and vocational performance,
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 2.505
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$232,017
Section 2.405. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Special Education
For the Missouri School for the Deaf
From School for the Deaf Trust Fund (1922) .................................................................$49,500
Section 2.410. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Special Education
For the Missouri School for the Blind
From School for the Blind Trust Fund (1920) ...........................................................$1,500,000
Section 2.415. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Special Education

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 37
For the Missouri Special Olympics Program, provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 2.505
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$100,000
Section 2.420. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Special Education
For the Missouri Schools for the Severely Disabled
From Handicapped Children’s Trust Fund (1618) ........................................................$200,000
Section 2.425. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Missouri Charter Public School Commission, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed from personal service to
expense and equipment
Personal Service ................................................................................................$576,039
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,810,551
From Charter Public School Commission Revolving Fund (1860) .............................3,386,590
Expense and Equipment
From Charter Public School Commission Federal Fund (1175) ......................... 500,000
Total (Not to exceed 6.00 F.T.E.) ..............................................................................$3,886,590
Section 2.430. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For grants to an organization that provides low interest loans to Missouri
charter public schools, provided that said organization shall be a
non-profit organization that has at least two years’ experience
administering a similar program for charter school facilities,
financing, and lending
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .....................................................$10,000,000
Section 2.440. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Missouri Commission for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing,
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 2.505
Personal Service ................................................................................................$438,534
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 233,512

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 38
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................672,046
For grants to organizations providing deaf-blind services pursuant to
Section 161.412.1, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................300,000
Personal Service ....................................................................................................43,248
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 119,000
From Missouri Commission for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing
Fund (1743) .........................................................................................................162,248
Expense and Equipment
From Missouri Commission for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing Board of
Certification of Interpreters Fund (1264) ................................................. 152,527
Total (Not to exceed 7.00 F.T.E.) ..............................................................................$1,286,821
Section 2.445. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Missouri Commission for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Statewide Hearing Aid Distribution Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$100,000
Section 2.450. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Missouri Commission for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing
For the Statewide Hearing Aid Distribution Program
From Statewide Hearing Aid Distribution Fund (1617) ...............................................$200,000
Section 2.455. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Missouri Holocaust Education and Awareness Commission
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$122,354
Section 2.460. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Missouri Assistive Technology Council
Personal Service ................................................................................................$272,500
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 572,601

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 39
From Assistive Technology Federal Fund (1188) ..........................................................845,101
Personal Service ..................................................................................................314,956
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,639,948
From Deaf Relay Service and Equipment Distribution Program Fund
(1559) ...............................................................................................................1,954,904
Personal Service ....................................................................................................70,851
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 675,000
From Assistive Technology Loan Revolving Fund (1889) ............................................745,851
Expense and Equipment
From Assistive Technology Trust Fund (1781) ...........................................................1,280,050
For the payment of refunds set off against debt as required by Section
143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753) ............................................................... 1,000
Total (Not to exceed 8.40 F.T.E.) ..............................................................................$4,826,906
Section 2.465. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, chargeable
to the General Revenue Fund-County Foreign Tax Distribution,
to the State School Moneys Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$197,367,837
Section 2.470. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
School Moneys Fund
From Fair Share Fund (1687) ..................................................................................$19,200,000
Section 2.475. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Outstanding Schools Trust Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$836,600,000
Section 2.480. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 40
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Classroom Trust Fund
From Gaming Proceeds for Education Fund (1285) ..............................................$385,000,000
Section 2.485. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Classroom Trust Fund
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) ........................................................................$16,763,770
Section 2.490. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the School
District Bond Fund
From Gaming Proceeds for Education Fund (1285) .....................................................$492,000
Section 2.495. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
School Moneys Fund
From School Building Revolving Fund (1279) .........................................................$1,500,000
Section 2.500. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
School Moneys Fund
From After-School Retreat Reading and Assessment Grant Program
Fund (1732) ...........................................................................................................$2,000
Section 2.505. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
payment of claims, premiums, and expenses as provided by
Sections 105.711 through 105.726, RSMo, to the State Legal
Expense Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 41
PART 2
Section 2.2003. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
In reference to Section 2.256 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be utilized towards policies, procedures, practices,
trainings, contracts, positions, organizational structures,
programs, or activities that solely or primarily support diversity,
equity, and inclusion initiatives, or efforts to manipulate or
influence based solely on race, color, ethnicity, gender identity or
sexual orientation.
Section 2.2005. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
In reference to Section 2.365 and Section 2.370 of Part 1 of this
act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of provider rates
greater than the 100th percentile of the current child care market
for infant and toddler provider rates, as determined from the most
recent child care market rate survey, and no funds shall be
expended in furtherance of provider rates greater than the 65th
percentile of the current child care market for pre-k and school-
age provider rates, as determined from the most recent child care
market rate survey. No funds shall be expended in furtherance of
any benefit greater than that provided for by the applicable
traditional or transitional child care subsidy income eligibility
threshold.
PART 3
Section 2.3005. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
In reference to all sections in Part 1 and Part 2 of this act:
The Department shall provide monthly expenditures and
projections for Child Care subsidy program for the current state
fiscal year and next state fiscal year to the House Budget and
Senate Appropriation Committee Chairs on a monthly basis.

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 42
Section 2.3010. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
In reference to all sections in Part 1 and Part 2 of this act:
The Department shall provide written notification prior to
submission to the federal government of state plans and state plan
amendments, and quarterly financial reports, to the House Budget
and Senate Appropriation Committee Chairs. The Department
shall include in the notification the actual documents submitted
to the federal government, as well as the federal government’s
responses when received.
Section 2.3015. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
In reference to all sections in Part 1 and Part 2 of this act:
The Department shall provide notification and correspondence
from the federal government of non-compliance with federal
programs or grants to the House Budget and Senate
Appropriation Committee Chairs.
Section 2.3020. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
In reference to all sections in Part 1 and Part 2 of this act:
The Department shall provide written notification of spend plans
and spend plan amendments to the House Budget and Senate
Appropriation Committee Chairs prior to submission to the
federal government and prior to expenditure of such funds.
Section 2.3025. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
The Department shall direct deposits of moneys received by the
state from the federal government for the Child Care and
Development Fund into the Child Care and Development Block
Grant Federal Fund (1168).

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2 43
Bill Totals
General Revenue Fund (797.07 F.T.E.) ..............................................................$4,748,431,877
Federal Funds (996.86 F.T.E.) ..............................................................................1,723,754,721
Other Funds (24.75 F.T.E.) ............................................................................... 2,187,566,215
Total (1,818.68 F.T.E.) .......................................................................................$8,659,752,813
